District of Columbia statutes.
29-608.10

Court proceedings.

(a)

A dissolved limited liability partnership that has published a notice under § 29-608.09 may file an application with the Superior Court, or, if the principal office is not located in the District, an appropriate court where the office of its principal office is located, for a determination of the amount and form of security to be provided for payment of claims that are contingent, have not been made known to the partnership, or are based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution but which, based on the facts known to the dissolved partnership, are reasonably expected to arise after the effective date of dissolution. Security is not required for any claim that is or is reasonably anticipated to be barred under § 29-608.08(c).

(b)

Not later than 10 days after the filing of an application under subsection (a) of this section, the dissolved limited liability partnership shall give notice of the proceeding to each claimant holding a contingent claim known to the partnership.

(c)

In any proceeding under this section, the court may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent all claimants whose identities are unknown. The reasonable fees and expenses of the guardian, including all reasonable expert witness fees, must be paid by the dissolved limited liability partnership.

(d)

A dissolved limited liability partnership that provides security in the amount and form ordered by the court under subsection (a) of this section satisfies the partnership’s obligations with respect to claims that are contingent, have not been made known to the partnership, or are based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution, and the claims may not be enforced against a partner or transferee who receives assets in liquidation.

(e)

This section applies only to a debt, obligation, or liability incurred while a partnership was a limited liability partnership.

History

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(8)(I), 59 DCR 13171

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-608.09, § 29-608.11, and § 29-610.02.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.